District of Columbia statutes.
32-210

Evidence of age.

The evidence of age required by this subchapter shall consist of 1 of the following proofs of age, which shall be required in the order herein designated:

(1)

A birth certificate or attested transcript issued by a registrar of vital statistics or other officer charged with the duty of recording births;

(2)

A record of age as given in the records of the school first attended by the minor, if obtainable, or in the earliest available school census;

(3)

A baptismal record or duly certified transcript thereof showing the date of birth and place of baptism of the minor; or

(4)

A bona fide contemporary record of the date and place of the minor’s birth kept in the Bible in which the records of the births in the family of the minor are preserved, or other documentary evidence satisfactory to the Board of Education, such as a passport showing the age of the minor, a certificate of arrival in the United States issued by the United States immigration officers and showing the age of the minor, or a life insurance policy.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1001, ch. 908, § 11
renumbered as § 10 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(12), 23 DCR 519
This section is referenced in § 32-209 and § 32-211.
1981 Ed., § 36-510.
1973 Ed., § 36-211.